Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1908
License; renewal; reexamination; when.

All original licenses may be renewed and all renewal licenses may be renewed by the plumbing board at the dates of their expiration. Such renewal licenses shall be granted, without a reexamination, upon the written application of the licensee filed with the board and showing that his purposes and condition remain unchanged, unless it is made to appear by affidavit before the board that the applicant is no longer competent, or entitled to such renewal license, in which event the renewal license shall not be granted until the applicant has undergone the examination hereinbefore required.

Laws 1901, c. 21, § 6, p. 323;

R.S.1913, § 5281;

C.S.1922, § 4504;

C.S.1929, § 19-308;

R.S.1943, § 19-308.